Utah statutes.
79-4-403.   User fees for golf -- Wasatch Mountain, Palisade, and Jordan
River State Parks.
(1)  The following user fees are assessed in the following parks for playing
nine holes of golf:
(a)  $1.50 at Wasatch Mountain State Park;
(b)  $1.50 at Palisade State Park; and
(c)  $1.50 at Green River State Park.
(2)  The fee in Subsection (1) is:
(a)  in addition to the fee set by the board; and
(b)  to be used at the park where the money is collected for:
(i)  the upgrade or development of facilities; or
(ii)  the purchase of golf course operation and maintenance equipment.
(3)  The revenue from the fees established in Subsection (1) are nonlapsing.
